Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-12] Arbitration; subsequent
litigation. Any person or the person's representative claiming that a tort
has been committed by a design professional or any design professional against
whom a claim has been made may elect to bypass the court annexed arbitration
program under section 601-20 after the claim has been submitted to the design
claim conciliation panel and the panel has rendered a decision or has not
reached a decision within the tolling period of the statute of limitations
under section 672B-15. [L 2007, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next